New York, session 2025-2026, S4370.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1704-a of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as added by section 1 of subpart A of part ZZZ of chapter 59 of the 3 laws of 2019, is amended and a new subdivision 1-a is added to read as 4 follows: 5 1. Consistent with the goals of reducing traffic congestion within the 6 central business district and funding capital projects the Triborough 7 bridge and tunnel authority shall have the power, subject to agreements 8 with its bondholders, and applicable federal law to establish and charge 9 variable tolls and fees for vehicles, including motorcycles, entering or 10 remaining in the central business district at any time and shall have 11 the power, subject to agreements with bondholders, and applicable feder- 12 al law to make rules and regulations for the establishment and 13 collection of central business district tolls, fees, and other charges. 14 For purposes of establishing a central business district toll or tolls 15 the board shall, at minimum, ensure annual revenues and fees collected 16 under such program, less costs of operation of the same, provide for 17 sufficient revenues into the central business district tolling capital 18 lockbox fund, established pursuant to section five hundred fifty-three-j 19 of the public authorities law necessary to fund fifteen billion dollars 20 for capital projects for the 2020 to 2024 MTA capital program, and any 21 additional revenues above that amount to be available for any successor 22 programs. Additionally, no toll may be established and charged on 23 passenger vehicles registered pursuant to subdivision six of section 24 four hundred one of this chapter more than once per day for purposes of 25 entering the central business district. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05783-01-5 S. 4370 2 1 1-a. The Triborough bridge and tunnel authority shall be authorized to 2 impose tolls and fees for motorcycles entering or remaining in the 3 central business district at any time and shall have the power, subject 4 to agreements with bondholders, and applicable federal law to make rules 5 and regulations for the establishment and collection of central business 6 district tolls, fees, and other charges. Such tolls and fees shall be 7 half of the charges for tolls and fees of other vehicles. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 9 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 10 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 11 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 12 completed on or before such effective date.